Massachusetts, session 194th, S2884.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 6A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 16GG the following section:-
Section 16HH. There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a
separate fund to be known as the integrating behavioral health and primary care workforce trust
fund to which shall be credited any appropriations, bond proceeds or other monies authorized by
the general court and specifically designated to be credited thereto, and additional funds,
including federal grants or loans or private donations. Any balance in the fund at the close of a
fiscal year shall be available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years and shall not revert to the
General Fund.
Amounts credited to the fund shall be expended for the purposes of expanding primary
care capacity in geographically underserved communities as determined by the secretary of
health and human services in consultation with the health policy commission.
of 3

The secretary of health and human services shall administer funds from the trust fund
through grants to primary care physicians, including, but not be limited to, family physicians,
internal medicine physicians, pediatricians, obstetricians and gynecologists; provided that, the
secretary shall prioritize the recruitment and retention of a culturally, ethnically and linguistically
diverse workforce; provided further, that, to be eligible for such grants, primary care physicians
shall:
(a) work in a practice setting: (1) with a significant public payor patient population as
determined by the secretary; and (2) that integrates primary and behavioral health care;
(b) have outstanding educational debt;
(c) not participate in any other Massachusetts loan repayment program; and
(d) be required to enter into a contract with the commonwealth for not less than 4 years;
and provided further, that the amounts of assistance per individual shall be pro-rated for
individuals working on a part-time basis.
The executive office of health and human services shall promulgate regulations for the
administration of the fund, which shall include the grant application process, eligible uses of
grant funds and penalties and repayment procedures if a participating individual fails to comply
with the program requirements; provided, however, that not less than 45 days prior to the
obligation of funds, the executive office shall submit a comprehensive program plan to the
executive office for administration and finance, the house and senate committees on ways and
means, the joint committee on mental health, substance use and recovery, the joint committee on
public health, the joint committee on labor and workforce development and the joint committee
on health care financing.
of 3

Not later than 6 months from the distribution of the first grant from the fund and by
January 1 annually thereafter, the secretary of health and human services shall file a report with
the clerks of the senate and the house of representatives, the joint committee on mental health,
substance use and recovery, the joint committee on public health, the joint committee on labor
and workforce development and the house and senate committees on ways and means detailing:
(i) the number of applications received; (ii) the number of grants awarded; (iii) the dollar amount
per grant; and (iv) any additional information deemed relevant by the secretary.
of 3